Mississippi, session 2026, HB1319.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 37-41-47, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 31-41-47.  It shall be unlawful for a driver of any school bus, whether a public or a contract bus, to drive said bus at a speed greater than forty-five (45) miles per hour while transporting children to and from school on regular routes; however, the maximum speed for interstate highways shall be sixty-five (65) miles per hour. However, any such driver, while operating a school bus on other authorized trips, shall not drive said school bus at a speed greater than * * *fifty (50) miles per hour, except the maximum speed for interstate highways shall be sixty‑five (65) miles per hour the posted speed limit for the roadway, provided that, in no event shall the driver exceed sixty-five (65) miles per hour, even if the posted speed limit is greater than sixty-five (65) miles per hour.  Any person who shall violate the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not less than Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) nor more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) for each such offense.  In addition thereto, upon such conviction, such driver may be discharged from further employment as a school bus driver or carrier and his contract as such may be terminated. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.